Wisconsin, session 2025, AB523.
do enact as follows:AB523,11Section 1. 347.475 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 347.475 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB523,2,33347.475 (1) (intro.) In this section, “airbag”:AB523,2,104(a) “Airbag” means an inflatable restraint system that is designed to be 5installed and to operate in a motor vehicle to deploy by inflating upon an impact of 6the vehicle with another object any component of a passive inflatable motor vehicle 7occupant crash protection system designed by a motor vehicle manufacturer to 8operate in the event of a collision and designed to meet federal motor vehicle safety 9standards for the specific make, model, and year of the motor vehicle in which it is 10or will be installed.AB523,211Section 2. 347.475 (1) (b) to (d) of the statutes are created to read:AB523,2,1512347.475 (1) (b) “Counterfeit airbag” means a replacement airbag, or an airbag 13component, that displays an unauthorized mark substantially similar to the mark 14of an original equipment manufacturer or a genuine supplier of parts to the 15manufacturer of a motor vehicle.AB523,2,1716(c) “Nonfunctional airbag” means a replacement airbag to which any of the 17following applies:AB523,2,18181. The replacement airbag was previously deployed or damaged.AB523,3,312. The replacement airbag has an electric fault that is detected by the motor 2vehicle’s diagnostic system when the installation procedure is completed and the 3motor vehicle is returned to the motor vehicle owner or transferred to a new owner.AB523,3,643. The replacement airbag includes a part or object intended to mislead the 5owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional airbag has 6been installed.AB523,3,874. The replacement airbag is prohibited from being sold under 49 USC 30120 8(j).AB523,3,119(d) “Replacement airbag” means an airbag intended to replace an original 10equipment manufacturer’s airbag that is faulty, has deployed, was stolen, has been 11recalled, or is part of a motor vehicle restoration.AB523,312Section 3. 347.475 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB523,3,1713347.475 (2) No person may, either personally or through an agent, import, 14manufacture, sell, offer for sale, install, reinstall, or distribute any previously 15deployed airbag or nonfunctional airbag. This subsection does not apply to the sale 16or transfer of a motor vehicle with a previously deployed airbag unless the 17deployment is concealed or disguised.AB523,418Section 4. 347.475 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB523,3,2019347.475 (5) No person may, either personally or through an agent, import, 20manufacture, sell, offer for sale, install, reinstall, or distribute a counterfeit airbag.AB523,521Section 5. 347.475 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB523,3,2222347.475 (6) This section does not apply to any of the following:AB523,4,223(a) A person installing, reinstalling, or replacing an airbag or other component 1of a passive inflatable motor vehicle occupant crash protection system in a motor 2vehicle used exclusively for police work.AB523,4,63(b) An owner or employee of a motor vehicle dealership or the owner of a motor 4vehicle who, before the sale of the vehicle, does not have knowledge that the vehicle’s 5airbag, or another component of the vehicle’s passive inflatable motor vehicle 6occupant crash protection system is counterfeit or nonfunctional.AB523,4,97(c) A person who transfers a vehicle title to an insurance company to satisfy an 8insurance claim when the insurance company declares the motor vehicle to be an 9actual total loss or constructive total loss.AB523,4,1110(d) An insurance company, salvage yard, or other entity that sells, recycles, or 11otherwise disposes of a motor vehicle as authorized by law or regulation. AB523,612Section 6. 347.50 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB523,4,1513347.50 (2) Any person violating s. 347.415 (1m), (2), and (3) to (5) or 347.475 14may be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned for not more than one year in the 15county jail, or both, for each violation.AB523,716Section 7. 347.50 (2e) of the statutes is created to read:AB523,4,1917347.50 (2e) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) to (e), any person violating s. 18347.475 may be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned for not more than one 19year in the county jail, or both.AB523,4,2120(b) Except as provided in pars. (c) to (e), any person violating s. 347.475 is 21guilty of a Class I felony for a 2nd or subsequent violation.AB523,4,2322(c) Any person violating s. 347.475 is guilty of a Class H felony if the violation 23resulted in bodily harm, as defined in s. 939.22 (4), to a person.AB523,5,21(d) Any person violating s. 347.475 is guilty of a Class G felony if the violation 2resulted in great bodily harm, as defined in s. 939.22 (14), to a person.AB523,5,43(e) Any person violating s. 347.475 is guilty of a Class F felony if the violation 4resulted in the death of a person.AB523,85Section 8. Initial applicability.AB523,5,76(1) This act first applies to violations committed on the effective date of this 7subsection.AB523,5,88